Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5392.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 40-5.2-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-5.2 entitled "The Rhode
Island Works Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-5.2-11. Cash assistance.
(a) A family or assistance unit found by the department to meet the eligibility criteria set
forth in this chapter shall be eligible to receive cash assistance as of the date a signed, written
application, signed under a penalty of perjury, is received by the department.
(b) The family members or assistance unit shall be eligible for cash assistance for so long
as they continue to meet the eligibility criteria outlined in accordance with this chapter. Parents and
adult non-parent caretaker relatives receiving cash assistance shall be eligible so long as they meet
the terms and conditions of the work requirements of § 40-5.2-12. An adult caretaker relative shall
be eligible for assistance as a member of the assistance unit so long as he or she meets all the
eligibility requirements of this chapter.
(c) The monthly amount of cash assistance shall be equal to the payment standard for the
family minus the countable income of the family in that month. The department is authorized to
reduce the amount of assistance in the month of application to reflect the number of the days
between the first day of the month and the effective date of the application.
(d) A decision on the application for assistance shall be made or rejected by the department
no later than thirty (30) days following the date submitted and shall be effective as of the date of
application.

(e) The payment standard is equal to the sum of the following: five hundred ten dollars
($510) (four hundred forty-five dollars ($445) for a family residing in subsidized housing) for the
first person; one hundred ninety-one dollars ($191) for the second person; one hundred sixty-four
dollars ($164) for the third person; and one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for each additional
person.
(f) A family or assistance unit eligible for cash assistance pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall if otherwise qualified, be enrolled for assistance in the supplemental nutrition
assistance program (SNAP) pursuant to the provisions of chapter 6 of title 40.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001040
========
LC001040 - Page 2 of 3